Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Division 2. Powers and Duties

§ 35-1-220.
Legal advisers; provisions as to enforcement.

The attorney general of Wyoming shall be legal adviser for the department of health and shall defend it in all action and proceedings brought against it. The district attorney for the county in which a cause of action may arise, shall bring any action requested by the department to abate a condition which exists in violation of, or to restrain or enforce any action which is in violation of, or to prosecute for the violation of, or for the enforcement of, the public health laws of Wyoming. If he fails to so act, the department may bring any such action and shall be represented by the attorney general or by special counsel.

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 67, § 9; W.S. 1957, § 35-14; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 22, § 1; 1991, ch. 221, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to duties generally of attorney general, see §

9-1-603

.

As to assignment of special assistant attorneys general to state agencies, see §

9-1-608

.

§ 35-1-221.
Judicial review of decisions.

Any person aggrieved and affected by a decision of the department of health shall be entitled to judicial review thereof, by filing in the district court of the Wyoming county of his residence, within thirty (30) days after such decision, an appropriate action requesting such review. The court may make any interested person a party to the action. The review shall be conducted by the court without a jury and shall be confined to the department’s record, if a complete record is so presented, except that in cases of alleged irregularities in the record or in the procedure before the department, testimony may be taken in and by the court, which may affirm the department’s decision or may reserve or modify it if the substantial rights of the appellant have been prejudiced as a result of the findings and decisions of the department because:

Contrary to or affecting constitutional rights or privileges; or

In excess of statutory authority or jurisdiction of the department, or resulting from other error or law; or

Made or promulgated upon unlawful procedure; or

Unsupported by substantial evidence in view of the entire record as submitted; or

Arbitrary or capricious.

Any party may have a review of the final judgment or decision of the district court by appeal to the supreme court of Wyoming.

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 67, § 10; W.S. 1957, § 35-15; Laws 1991, ch. 221, § 2.

Cross references. —

For procedure governing appeals, see Rules 1 to 3, 7.02, 7.03, 10.04, 10.05 and 12, W.R.A.P.

§ 35-1-222.
Sanitary information generally.

The department of health shall cause all proper sanitary information in its possession to be promptly forwarded to the county health officers, adding thereto such useful suggestions as the experience of the department may supply, and it is also hereby made the duty of said county health officers to supply the like information and suggestions to the department of health, and the department of health is authorized to require reports and information at such times of such facts and of such nature and extent relating to the safety of life and promotion of health as its bylaws or rules may provide; from all public or private dispensaries, hospitals, asylums, infirmaries, prisons, schools, and from managers, principals, and officers thereof, and from all other public institutions, their officers, managers and from the proprietors, managers, lessees, and occupants of all places of public resort in the state, but such reports and information shall only be required concerning matters or particulars in respect to which they may in their opinion need information for the proper discharge of their duties. The department shall, when requested by public authorities, or when they may deem it best advise the officers of the state, counties, cities, or towns or local governments in regard to sanitary drainage and the location, drainage, ventilation and sanitary provisions of any public institution, building or public place.

History.

Laws 1901, ch. 55, § 8; C.S. 1910, § 2935; C.S. 1920, § 3598; R.S. 1931, § 103-207; C.S. 1945, § 63-109; W.S. 1957, § 35-16; Laws 1991, ch. 221, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to sanitation of public institutions, see §

35-1-102

.

§ 35-1-223.
Cooperation to prevent spread of contagious diseases; report of epidemics or diseases required from local health officials.

The department of health shall give all information that may be reasonably requested concerning any threatened danger to the public health, and the local health officers and all the state, county, city and town officers in the state shall give the like information to the state health officer, and the department and said state, county, city and town officers, insofar as legal and practicable, shall cooperate to prevent the spread of diseases, and for the protection of life and the promotion of health within the sphere of their respective duties. When in any county, an epidemic or contagious or infectious disease including venereal diseases, is known to exist, it shall be the duty of the county health officer of such county to immediately notify the state health officer of the existence of the same, with such facts as to its cause and continuance as may then be known.

History.

Laws 1901, ch. 55, § 9; C.S. 1910, § 2936; C.S. 1920, § 3599; Laws 1921, ch. 160, § 5; R.S. 1931, § 103-208; C.S. 1945, § 63-110; Laws 1951, ch. 40, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-17; Laws 1991, ch. 221, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to neglect or failure of officials to perform duty generally, see §

35-1-103

.

For penalty for failure to report diseases, see §

35-1-105

.

As to duty to make sanitary inspection of barbershops, see §

33-7-110

.

§ 35-1-224.
Inspection of public buildings and grounds or plans or description thereof.

It is hereby made the duty of all boards and agents having the control, charge or custody of any public structure, work, ground or erection, or of any plan, description, outlines, drawings thereof, or relating thereto, made, kept or controlled by any public authority, to promote and facilitate the examination and inspection and the making of copies of the same by any officer or person by the department of health authorized; and the members of the department may, without fee or hindrance enter, examine and survey all such grounds, erection, structures, buildings and places.

History.

Laws 1901, ch. 55, § 10; C.S. 1910, § 2937; C.S. 1920, § 3600; R.S. 1931, § 103-209; C.S. 1945, § 63-111; W.S. 1957, § 35-18; Laws 1991, ch. 221, § 2.

§ 35-1-225.
Inspection of water supply; duties as to streets and public structures generally.

The department of health is authorized and empowered to investigate and ascertain as far as possible, in relation to the pollution of streams and natural waters of this state by artificial causes, or of all waterworks, and water systems belonging to any city or town, sanitary district, corporation, company or individual, in this state and supplying water for public consumption, which in their judgment may be necessary to determine the sanitary and economic effects of such pollution, and to enter in and upon the grounds, buildings and premises, waterworks, reservoirs, pipelines, pump houses and everything connected with the collection and distribution of water to the inhabitants of any city or town, to make, institute, and conduct needful experiments pertaining thereto, and shall have power to summon witnesses, administer oaths, and hear evidence relating to such matters, and to make full report to the city, town or sanitary district authorities and also to the proper officers of any privately owned water utility when included in such investigations, of their operations and investigations in writing; and it shall be the duty of all such officers when notified of any unsanitary conditions of streets, alleys, sidewalks, waterworks, or other public ways, structures or improvements under their control, to at once take steps to repair, cleanse, abate or destroy the same.

History.

Laws 1901, ch. 55, § 11; C.S. 1910, § 2938; C.S. 1920, § 3601; R.S. 1931, § 103-210; C.S. 1945, § 63-112; Laws 1953, ch. 34, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-19; Laws 1991, ch. 221, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to protection of public water supply, see §§

35-4-201

,

35-4-202

and

35-4-220

to

35-4-223

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Citizen's action under 33 USC § 1365(a)(1) for violation of effluent standards or limitations under Federal Water Pollution Control Act (33 USC § 1251 et seq.) or orders with respect thereto, 68 ALR Fed 701.

Actions brought under Federal Water Pollution Control Act Amendments of 1972 (Clean Water Act)(33 U.S.C. §§ 1251 et seq.) — Supreme Court cases, 163 ALR Fed 531.

§ 35-1-226.
Power of department in cities and towns.

It shall be the duty of the state department of health, upon petition of at least twenty (20) taxpayers in any community, to send a competent representative to any incorporated city or town in this state for the purpose of inspecting and thoroughly investigating the sanitary condition of such city or town and the department shall have the power and it shall be the duty of the department to condemn, in any such city or town, any buildings, sewers, water connections, or other things, that in their judgment are in such condition as is likely to produce or cause the spread of epidemic diseases. And the department shall give notice to the mayor and council of such city or town to repair, remove, cleanse or remedy such defect or defects, within ten (10) days, and if the same shall not be done within the time specified in said notice, as directed by the department of health, it shall be the duty of the department to have same done; and the department is authorized to employ sufficient labor and furnish all necessary materials for the performance of such work, and it shall be the duty of the department, upon the completion of such work, to issue certificates to the person or persons performing such work and furnishing material therefor, and to file a report of the expense incurred in the performance of such work with the clerk of said city or town; and it shall be the duty of the council of such city or town where such work has been performed, to issue warrant or warrants to the proper parties for the payment of all such expense. Said warrant or warrants to be paid by the treasurer of such city or town as other warrants are paid.

History.

Laws 1903, ch. 94, § 2; C.S. 1910, § 2951; C.S. 1920, § 3614; R.S. 1931, § 103-223; C.S. 1945, § 63-113; W.S. 1957, § 35-20; Laws 1991, ch. 221, § 2.

Cross references. —

For powers of cities and towns in regards to public health, see §

15-1-103

.

§ 35-1-227.
Supervision of county health officers.

The county health officers of this state shall be under the direction and supervision of the state department of health, and the state department of health shall have authority to make such rules and regulations for the government and direction of said county health officers as in their judgment may be best suited to maintain the public health.

History.

Laws 1901, ch. 55, § 18; C.S. 1910, § 2945; C.S. 1920, § 3608; R.S. 1931, § 103-217; C.S. 1945, § 63-123; W.S. 1957, § 35-21; Laws 1991, ch. 221, § 2.

§ 35-1-228.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1991, ch. 221, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1925, ch. 123, § 1, related to the sale of domestic salt and the prevention of goiter.

§ 35-1-229.
Rules and regulations.

The state department of health is hereby empowered and directed to make such rules and regulations as shall in its judgment be necessary for the carrying out of the provisions of this act, including rules and regulations providing for the control and treatment of persons isolated or quarantined under the provisions of W.S.

35-4-133

and

35-4-134

, and such other rules and regulations not in conflict with provisions of this act concerning the control of venereal diseases and concerning the care, treatment and quarantine of persons infected therewith as it may from time to time deem advisable. All such regulations so made shall be of force and binding upon all county and municipal health officers and other persons affected by this act and shall have the force and effect of law; provided, further, that the expense incident to the quarantine and treatment of venereally infected persons in prisons shall be borne by the county in which the person or persons are imprisoned, excepting inmates of state institutions which shall be borne by the state, when evidenced by proper vouchers and receipts approved by the department of health.

The department of health may promulgate rules and regulations to set standards for the chemical, bacteriological, physical or radiological content of a small water supply and shall be applicable only when a legal interest in real property to which the small water supply is appurtenant is conveyed from one (1) party to another or when a conveyance is reasonably anticipated and when such standards are required by a lender. As used in this subsection, “small water supply” means any water supply with not more than nine (9) service connections, which is currently used for human consumption or for which plans exist for its future use for human consumption. The cost of any testing to determine the chemical, bacteriological, physical or radiological content of a small water supply shall be borne by the parties.

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 160, § 26; R.S. 1931, § 103-237; C.S. 1945, § 63-142; W.S. 1957, § 35-23; Laws 1991, ch. 221, § 2; 1995, ch. 184, § 1; 1996, ch. 66, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to penalty for violation of rules and regulations, see §

35-1-106

.

As to rules and regulations of county, municipal and district health departments, see §

35-1-303

.

As to rules and regulations relative to communicable diseases, see §

35-4-101

.

As to quarantine regulations generally, see §

35-4-104

.

For provisions concerning venereal diseases, see §§

35-4-130

to

35-4-138

.

Meaning of “this act.” —

As to meaning of “this act,” see Editor's note to §

35-1-101

.

Cited

in

Distad v. Cubin, 633 P.2d 167,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 370

(Wyo. 1981).